Wisconsin, session 2025, AB253.
do enact as follows:AB253,11Section 1. 49.472 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:AB253,2,4249.472 (3m) Independence accounts. (a) The department shall allow an 3individual to deposit up to $15,000 of the individual’s gross earnings in an 4independence account over a 12-month period.AB253,2,65(b) In determining assets under sub. (3) (b), the department may not include 6assets that are acquired by inheritance.AB253,2,137(c) If the department determines that federal approval is required to 8implement any part of this subsection, the department shall submit any state plan 9amendment, waiver of federal Medicaid law, or other request for federal approval 10necessary to implement this subsection. The department shall implement this 11subsection to the extent that the federal department of health and human services 12does not disapprove of the plan amendment, waiver request, or other request for 13federal approval.AB253,2,1414